Hawaii statutes.
§476-11 Catalog mail order sales.
Credit sales negotiated and entered into by mail without personal solicitation
by a salesperson or other representative of the seller, and if seller's cash
price and other terms are clearly set forth in a catalog, or other printed
solicitation of business, which is generally available to the public, may be
made as provided in this section. This chapter shall apply to such sales
except that the seller shall not be required to deliver a copy of the contract
to the buyer as provided in section 476-7, and if, when the proposed credit
sale contract is received by the seller from the buyer, there are blank spaces
to be filled in, the seller may insert in the appropriate blank spaces the
amounts of money and other terms which are set forth in the seller's catalog
which is then in effect; and in lieu of the copy of the contract provided for
in section 476-7, the seller shall, within fifteen days from date of shipment
of goods, furnish to the buyer a written statement of the items, inserted in
such blank spaces. [L 1961, c 102, pt of §1; Supp, §201A-8; HRS §476-9; am and
ren L 1984, c 86, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next